Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3608
Return of policy or certificate; notice; refund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, medicare supplement policies and certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy or certificate or attached thereto stating in substance that the applicant shall have the right to return the policy or certificate within thirty days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason. Any refund made pursuant to this section shall be paid directly to the applicant by the issuer in a timely manner.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 25.